Oklahoma, session 2025, SB633.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 2-7-308, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-7-308. A. The Office of Juvenile Affairs shall
implement an agency-wide management information system for all
programs and services of the Office of Juvenile Affairs related to
children, youth and families.
B. The management information system shall:
1. To the maximum extent possible, be based upon the
integration, utilization and modification, as necessary, of existing
information systems within the Office of Juvenile Affairs;
2. Provide for the security of and limited access to the
information;
ENGR. S. B. NO. 633 Page 1

3. Include case-specific information, including outcomes, and
have the ability to monitor the status of children and youth
receiving services through the Office of Juvenile Affairs;
4. Be capable of providing management reports and information
regarding the various children and youth programs of the Office of
Juvenile Affairs, and of providing aggregate information necessary
for planning, monitoring and evaluation of said programs and
services; and
5. Be designed so that management and analytical reports can be
readily generated for those who require them.
C. 1. The management information system implemented by the
Office of Juvenile Affairs shall be integrated with the child
welfare management information system implemented by the Department
of Human Services and to the extent possible with the Juvenile
Justice Information System.
2. The management information system shall be available to the
superintendent or designee for the Oklahoma School for the Blind,
for the Oklahoma School for the Deaf, and for public school
districts, and to any other persons authorized to obtain
confidential records and reports of the Office of Juvenile Affairs
pursuant to Chapter 6 of the Oklahoma Juvenile Code.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.


ENGR. S. B. NO. 633 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 13th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. B. NO. 633 Page 3